Maine, session 132, LD2136.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. Department of Health and Human Services to provide funding to
support Preble Street anti-trafficking program. The Department of Health and
Human Services, notwithstanding the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 5, section 1825-B,
shall provide funds to support the Preble Street anti-trafficking program.
Sec. 2. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES, DEPARTMENT OF
Purchased Social Services 0228
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for anti-trafficking services.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $317,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $317,000
Page 1 - 132LR2918(05)